District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.04

Immunity from civil liability.

An employer who complies with an income-withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this chapter is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 504
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-345.4.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 504 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).